dev/verb/verb.bn.dix
    <pardef n="/আস__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছিলাম</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছিল</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pcnd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসবে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসল</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছিল</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppst"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসবেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসবে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসবেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসবে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসলি</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আস</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসতে থাকব</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছিল</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসবেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছিল</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসব</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছিল</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসতে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছিলাম</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসলে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসলে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসিস</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসি</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছি</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছিলি</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসলেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসবে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসা</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসতেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আস</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসিস</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসত</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছিস</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আস</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছিলেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছিলে</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসছ</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছিস</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আসুন</l>
          <r>আস<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এসেছেন</l>

    <e lm="আস"><i></i><par n="/আস__vblex"/></e>
